Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB58.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 200 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 5 of this Act:
(1) "Board" means the Kentucky Diaper Access Board established in Section 2 of
this Act;
(2) "Child" means an individual under eighteen (18) years of age;
(3) "Community resource organization" means an organization that meets the
criteria established in Section 5 of this Act;
(4) "Diaper access program" means a system of direct distribution of diapers and
diaper products to individuals; and
(5) "Trust fund" means the Kentucky diaper access trust fund established in Section
4 of this Act.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 200 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky Diaper Access Board is hereby established and shall be attached to
the cabinet for administrative purposes only.
(2) The board shall be composed of:
(a) The following five (5) voting members:
1. The secretary of the cabinet or designee; and
2. Four (4) members appointed by the Governor, who shall reflect,
inasmuch as possible, the different geographic regions of the
Commonwealth in order to promote geographic balance on the board;
and
(b) The following two (2) nonvoting members:
1. One (1) member of the Senate appointed by the President of the
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 1/5/2026 11:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 273
Senate; and
2. One (1) member of the House of Representatives appointed by the
Speaker of the House of Representatives.
(3) The secretary of the cabinet shall serve as chair of the board or designate a chair
to serve at the pleasure of the secretary. The board may elect other officers and
establish committees of the board as it considers appropriate.
(4) (a) Board members shall not receive compensation for their services, but shall
be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of their
duties on the board consistent with the reimbursement policy for state
employees established in KRS 45.101 and administrative regulations
promulgated thereunder.
(b) Reimbursements, executive director and staff salaries, and all actual and
necessary operating expenses of the board shall be paid from the trust fund,
pursuant to an authorization as provided in Section 5 of this Act.
(5) The board may appoint an executive director of the board to exercise the powers
and carry out the duties of the board.
(6) A majority of the entire voting membership of the board shall constitute a
quorum for the transaction of business, and all actions of the board shall be by
vote of a majority of the entire voting membership.
(7) (a) The board shall conduct all business during public meetings held in
accordance with the Kentucky Open Meetings Act, KRS 61.805 to 61.850.
(b) Records of board meetings and other records prepared, owned, used, in the
possession of, or retained by the board in the performance its duties under
Sections 1 to 5 of this Act shall be made available to the public in
accordance with the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 200 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 1/5/2026 11:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 273
(1) The Kentucky Diaper Access Board shall:
(a) Meet at least once annually at the call of the chair;
(b) Beginning in 2027, and biennially thereafter, develop a state plan for the
distribution of funds from the Kentucky diaper access trust fund established
in Section 4 of this Act. The board shall review already existing diaper
access programs, and the plan shall ensure that an equal opportunity exists
for establishment of diaper access programs and receipt of trust fund
moneys among all geographic areas in this state;
(c) Submit the plan developed under paragraph (b) of this subsection to the
clerk of the Senate, the clerk of the House of Representatives, and the
Governor;
(d) Provide for the coordination and exchange of information on the
establishment and maintenance of diaper access programs;
(e) Develop and publicize criteria for the receipt of trust fund moneys by
eligible community resource organizations and eligible diaper access
programs;
(f) Review, approve, and monitor the expenditure of trust fund moneys by
community resource organizations and diaper access programs;
(g) Provide statewide educational and public informational seminars for the
purpose of:
1. Developing public awareness regarding the availability of diaper
access programs;
2. Encouraging professional persons and groups to recognize and
disseminate information on diaper access programs;
3. Encouraging and coordinating the development of community
resource organizations;
4. Making information about diaper access programs available to the
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 1/5/2026 11:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 273
public and organizations and agencies that serve children; and
5. Encouraging the development of community diaper access programs;
(h) Establish a procedure for an annual, internal evaluation of the functions,
responsibilities, and performance of the board. In a year in which the
biennial state plan is prepared, the evaluation shall be coordinated with the
preparation of the state plan; and
(i) By December 1 of each year, submit a report to the Governor and to the
Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint
Committee on Families and Children, the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue, and the Office of Budget Review,
recommending changes in state programs, statutes, policies, budgets, and
standards that will reduce the problem of diaper access, improve
coordination among government and private agencies that provide diaper
access services, and improve the condition of children and parents or
guardians who are in need of diaper access program services.
(2) The board may enter into contracts with public or private agencies to fulfill the
requirements of Sections 1 to 5 of this Act, but shall utilize existing state
resources and staff of participating agencies whenever practicable.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 200 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky diaper access trust fund is created as a trust and agency account in
the State Treasury for the purposes established in Section 5 of this Act.
(2) The trust fund shall be administered and maintained by the State Treasurer.
(3) The trust fund shall consist of general fund appropriations, gifts and grants from
public and private sources, and federal funds.
(4) Any unalloted or unencumbered balances in the trust fund shall be invested as
provided in KRS 42.500(9), and income earned from the investments shall be
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 1/5/2026 11:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 273
credited to the trust fund.
(5) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any moneys remaining in the trust fund at the close
of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal
year.
(6) (a) Until the total amount of assets in the trust fund exceeds twenty million
dollars ($20,000,000), not more than one-half of the money deposited into
the trust fund each year, plus the earnings credited to the trust fund during
the previous fiscal year shall be available for disbursement upon the
authorization of the board as provided in Section 5 of this Act.
(b) Upon certification by the State Treasurer that the assets in the trust fund
exceed twenty million dollars ($20,000,000), only the earnings credited to
the trust fund shall be available for disbursement upon the authorization of
the board as provided in Section 5 of this Act.
(7) Moneys granted or received as gifts or donations to the trust fund shall be
available for disbursement upon appropriation by the General Assembly, and
funds authorized for expenditure shall not be considered assets for purposes of
subsection (6) of this section.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 200 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board may authorize the disbursement of available moneys from the trust
fund, upon legislative appropriations, for exclusively the following purposes,
which are listed in the order of preference for expenditure:
(a) To fund a private nonprofit or public organization in the development or
operation of a diaper access program if the following conditions are met:
1. The appropriate community resource organization has reviewed and
approved the program. This subparagraph does not apply if a
community resource organization does not exist for the geographic
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 1/5/2026 11:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 273
area to be served by the program;
2. The organization agrees to match a percentage, as determined by the
board, of the total cost of the project;
3. The organization demonstrates a willingness and ability to provide
program models and consultation to organizations and communities
regarding program development and maintenance; and
4. Other conditions that the board may deem appropriate;
(b) To fund community resource organizations;
(c) To fund a statewide public education and awareness campaign on diaper
access programs through the use of electronic and print media to inform the
public about the programs; and
(d) 1. To fund the board for the actual and necessary operating expenses
that the board incurs in performing its duties in accordance with
subsection (4) of Section 2 of this Act.
2. Authorizations for disbursement of trust fund moneys under this
paragraph shall be kept at a minimum in furtherance of the primary
purposes of the trust fund established in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of
this subsection and the direct provision of services to diaper access
programs.
(2) In authorizing disbursements to community resource organizations, the board
shall consider the degree to which the community resource organization meets
the following criteria:
(a) Has as its primary purpose the development and facilitation of a
collaborative community diaper access program in a specific geographical
area while utilizing trained volunteers and existing community resources,
wherever practicable;
(b) Is composed of local representatives and does not exclude any organization
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 1/5/2026 11:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 273
or person that the board deems necessary;
(c) Demonstrates a willingness and ability to provide diaper access program
models and consultation to organizations and communities regarding
diaper access program development and maintenance;
(d) Agrees to match fifty percent (50%) of the project cost in accordance with
subsection (1)(a)2. of this section. The fifty percent (50%) match amount
may be through existing organization dollars, in-kind contributions, or a
combination thereof. The amount and types of in-kind services are subject
to the approval of the board; and
(e) Other criteria that the board deems appropriate.
(3) The board may authorize the disbursement of trust fund moneys under this
section to private nonprofit organizations, public organizations, and community
resource organizations that request to work in collaboration together
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 1/5/2026 11:07 AM Jacketed